Utah statutes.
67-19-35.   Reporting of convictions under federal and state drug laws.

(1)  An employee who is convicted under a federal or state criminal statute regulating the manufacture, distribution, dispensation, possession, or use of a controlled substance shall report the conviction to the director of his agency within five calendar days after the date of conviction.

(2)  Upon notification either under Subsection (1) or otherwise, the director of the agency shall notify the federal agency for which a contract is being performed within 10 days after receiving notice.

